District of Columbia statutes.
5-132.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(1A)

“DCPS” means the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(2)

“MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.

(2A)

“Public charter schools” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 38-1800.02(29).

(3)

“School resource officer” means a sworn MPD officer assigned to DCPS or public charter schools for the purpose of working in collaboration with DCPS, public charter schools, and community-based organizations to:

(A)

Prevent crime through community-oriented policing strategies;

(B)

Address crime and disorder, gang, and drug activity problems affecting or occurring in or around the schools to which the school resource officer is assigned; and

(C)

Ensure that DCPS schools and grounds and public charter schools and their grounds are safe environments for students, teachers, and staff.

(4)

“School security guards” means un-armed personnel, trained and hired by the MPD School Safety Division.

(5)

“School security personnel” means school resource officers and school security guards.

(6)

“Superintendent” means the Superintendent of the District of Columbia Public Schools.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-350, § 101, 52 DCR 2005
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-320, § 2(a), 56 DCR 219
Oct. 2, 2010, D.C. Law 18-232, § 201(a), 57 DCR 4504
D.C. Law 17-320 redesignated former par. (1) as par. (1A); and added par. (1).
D.C. Law 18-232 added par. (2A); in the lead-in language of par. (3), inserted “or public charter schools” and “, public charter schools,”; and, in par. (3)(C), substituted “DCPS schools and grounds and public charter schools and their grounds” for “DCPS schools and grounds”.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-318, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4707).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department School Safety and Security Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-496, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8797).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-596, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11219).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-3, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2675).